District of Columbia statutes.
50-2305.02

Effective date.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to violations which occur after the Director has promulgated the necessary regulations to carry out this chapter pursuant to § 50-2301.07.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 702, 25 DCR 1275
1981 Ed., § 40-642.
1973 Ed., § 40-1127.